Maine, session 132, LD1660.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4684-D is enacted to read:
§4684-D. Claims against government entities
1. Definitions. As used in this section, unless the context otherwise indicates, the
following terms have the following meanings.
A. "Government" means the State, a county or municipal government and any other
political subdivision of the State.
B. "Government employee" means an individual employed or contracted by a
government employer.
C. "Government employer" means an executive, legislative or judicial agency,
department, board, commission, authority, institution or instrumentality of the State or
of a county, municipality or other political subdivision in this State.
2. Applicability. Notwithstanding the Maine Tort Claims Act and any provision of this
chapter to the contrary, if a claim is brought under section 4681 or 4682 against a
government employer or government employee, under color of law, intentionally
interfering or attempting to interfere with the exercise or enjoyment by any other person of
a right secured by the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Maine, the
provisions of this section apply.
3. Government employer; proper defendant. A government employer, and not the
government employee, is liable for an injury caused by an act or omission of a government
employee who violates a right of another person under the United States Constitution or
the Constitution of Maine. The proper defendant in an action under this section is the
government employer and is not a government employee.
4. Notification of government employee. A government employer shall notify the
government employee whose act or omission is the subject of a claim under this chapter
within 10 days of the government employer being served with a complaint pursuant to this
section.
5. Right to intervene. A government employee subject to a claim pursuant to this
section has a right to intervene under the Maine Rules of Civil Procedure, Rule 24(a) as a
3rd-party defendant in an action under this section.
6. Limitation on damages. Notwithstanding Title 14, section 8104-D or any other
provision of law to the contrary, a government employee may not be found financially
liable in an action under this section.
7. Exceptions. Except as provided in subsection 10, an action brought under this
section is not subject to:
A. Common law doctrines of immunity;
B. Qualified immunity;
C. Sovereign immunity, governmental immunity, custom or policy; or
D. Immunities and limitations on liability or damages under any other provision of law.
Page 1 - 132LR1675(01)

8. Judicial and legislative immunity. This section may not be construed to abrogate
the immunity of judges or legislators at any level of government pursuant to Title 14,
section 8104-B for actions taken in their judicial or legislative capacities.
9. Statute of limitations. A claim under this section must be commenced no later than
3 years from the date the cause of action accrues.
10. Evaluating use of force. When evaluating a government employee's use of force
under the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Maine in an action under this
section, the court shall evaluate the reasonableness of the force used from the perspective
of a reasonable government employee on the scene confronted with the immediate facts
and circumstances in existence when the force was used, giving due consideration to the
fact that government employees often must make split-second decisions in tense, uncertain
and rapidly evolving situations. The court may not use hindsight or consider facts and
circumstances that were later discovered when determining the reasonableness of the force
used.
11. Order. The court's order in an action under this section must be supported by
findings of fact and conclusions of law.
12. Attorney's fees and costs. Notwithstanding section 4683, with respect to a claim
under this section:
A. If a plaintiff prevails, the government is liable for reasonable attorney's fees and
other litigation costs; and
B. If the court dismisses the complaint and makes a finding that the complaint was
frivolous, the court may award reasonable attorney's fees and costs to the prevailing
party.
13. Termination of employment. For an employment contract or agreement entered
into on or after the effective date of this section and notwithstanding any provision of law
to the contrary, a court's finding that a government employee violated a right of another
person under the United States Constitution or the Constitution of Maine under this chapter
is evidence that the government employer has just cause for terminating the employment
of the government employee. The government employer's termination of an employment
contract or agreement under this subsection does not affect the government employer's
liability under this chapter.